en: Rolling stock type: Caboose/Brake van; Freight car; Locomotive; Maintenance-of-way vehicle; Multiple unit (EMU/DMU); Passenger car; Tender; Train set; Tram/Streetcar; Other
th: ประเภทของรถไฟ: รถโบกี้เบรก; รถตู้สินค้า; หัวรถจักร; รถซ่อมบำรุงทาง; รถไฟฟ้า/รถดีเซลราง (EMU/DMU); รถโดยสาร; รถพ่วงบรรทุกเชื้อเพลิง; ชุดรถไฟ; รถราง; อื่นๆ
nl: Rollend materieel type: Remwagen/conducteurswagen; Goederenwagon; Locomotief; Onderhoudsvoertuig; Treinstel (EMU/DMU); Rijtuig; Tender; Treinset; Tram; Overige
pt-PT: Tipo de material circulante: Furgão/furgão de cauda; Vagão de mercadorias; Locomotiva; Veículo de manutenção de via; Unidade múltipla (EMU/DMU); Carruagem de passageiros; Tender; Conjunto de comboio; Elétrico; Outro
ko: 철도 차량 유형: 승무원차/브레이크 밴; 화물차; 기관차; 선로 보수차; 동차(EMU/DMU); 객차; 탄수차; 편성 열차; 트램/노면 전차; 기타
es: Tipo de material rodante: Furgón de cola/furgón de frenos; Vagón de carga; Locomotora; Vehículo de mantenimiento de vía; Unidad múltiple (EMU/DMU); Vagón de pasajeros; Ténder; Set de tren; Tranvía; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta tirnih vozil: Službeni vagon/zavorni vagon; Tovorni vagon; Lokomotiva; Vozilo za vzdrževanje prog; Motorna garnitura (EMG/DMG); Potniški vagon; Tender; Vlakovna kompozicija; Tramvaj; Drugo
nb: Type togmateriell: Konduktørvogn / bremsevogn; Godsvogn; Lokomotiv; Vedlikeholdskjøretøy for spor; Motorvognsett (EMU/DMU); Passasjervogn; Tender; Togsett; Trikk; Annet
fi: Liikkuvan kaluston tyyppi: Jarruvaunu; Tavaravaunu; Veturi; Radanhoitoajoneuvo; Moottorivaunu (EMU/DMU); Matkustajavaunu; Tenderi; Junasarja; Raitiovaunu; Muu
ru: Тип подвижного состава: Тормозной/хвостовой вагон; Грузовой вагон; Локомотив; Путевая машина; Моторвагонный подвижной состав (МВПС); Пассажирский вагон; Тендер; Поездной состав; Трамвай; Другое
pl: Typ taboru: Wagon służbowy / hamulcowy; Wagon towarowy; Lokomotywa; Pojazd techniczny (drogowy); Zespół trakcyjny (EZT / SZT); Wagon pasażerski; Tender; Skład pociągu (zestaw); Tramwaj; Inne
cs: Typ kolejových vozidel: Služební/brzdový vůz; Nákladní vůz; Lokomotiva; Vůz údržby trati; Motorová jednotka (EMU/DMU); Osobní vůz; Tendr; Vlaková souprava; Tramvaj; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta željezničkog vozila: Službeni vagon / kočnički vagon; Teretni vagon; Lokomotiva; Vozilo za održavanje pruge; Motorni vlak (EMU/DMU); Putnički vagon; Tender; Garnitura vlaka; Tramvaj; Ostalo
ja: 鉄道車両の種類: 車掌車 / 緩急車; 貨車; 機関車; 保線車両; マルチプルユニット (EMU / DMU); 客車; 炭水車; 列車セット; 路面電車; その他
lt-LT: Geležinkelio riedmenų tipas: Stabdomasis vagonas / tarnybinis vagonas; Prekinis vagonas; Lokomotyvas; Kelio priežiūros transporto priemonė; Motorinis traukinys (EMU / DMU); Keleivinis vagonas; Tenderis; Traukinio sąstatas; Tramvajus; Kita
bg-BG: Тип подвижен железопътен състав: Служебен/спирачен вагон; Товарен вагон; Локомотив; Машина за поддръжка на пътя; Мотрисен влак (EMU/DMU); Пътнически вагон; Тендер; Влакова композиция; Трамвай; Друго
pt-BR: Material rodante tipo: Vagão-caboose/Vagão-freio; Vagão de carga; Locomotiva; Veículo de manutenção de via; Unidade múltipla (EMU/DMU); Carro de passageiros; Tênder; Conjunto de trens; Bonde; Outro
sk-SK: Typ železničného vozidla: Služobný vozeň/brzdársky vozeň; Nákladný vozeň; Lokomotíva; Traťový stroj; Ucelená jednotka (EMU/DMU); Osobný vozeň; Tender; Vlaková súprava; Električka; Iné
vi: Loại toa xe: Toa cuối/Toa phanh; Toa chở hàng; Đầu máy; Xe bảo dưỡng đường sắt; Đoàn tàu tự hành (EMU/DMU); Toa hành khách; Toa than nước; Bộ xe lửa; Tàu điện/Tàu điện mặt đất; Khác
fr: Type de matériel roulant: Wagon de queue/fourgon-frein; Wagon de marchandises; Locomotive; Véhicule d’entretien des voies; Unité multiple (EMU/DMU); Voiture de voyageurs; Tender; Rame; Tramway; Autre
tr: Demiryolu araç tipi: Yük treni vagonu/fren vagonu; Yük vagonu; Lokomotif; Yol bakım aracı; Çoklu birim (EMU/DMU); Yolcu vagonu; Tender; Tren seti; Tramvay; Diğer
zh-CN: 轨道车辆类型: 守车/制动车; 货车; 机车; 轨道维护车; 动车组 (EMU/DMU); 客车; 煤水车; 列车组; 有轨电车; 其他
sv: Typ av rullande materiel: Bromsvagn; Godsvagn; Lok; Banunderhållsfordon; Motorvagnståg (EMU/DMU); Personvagn; Tender; Tågsätt; Spårvagn; Övrigt
de: Typ des Schienenfahrzeugs: Begleitwagen/Bremswagen; Güterwagen; Lokomotive; Gleisbaufahrzeug; Triebzug (EMU/DMU); Personenwagen; Tender; Zug-Set; Straßenbahn; Sonstige
da: Type rullende materiel: Tjenestevogn/bremsevogn; Godsvogn; Lokomotiv; Køretøj til sporvedligeholdelse; Togsæt (EMU/DMU); Passagervogn; Tender; Togsæt; Sporvogn; Andet
it: Tipo di materiale rotabile: Carrozza di coda/freno; Carro merci; Locomotiva; Veicolo per la manutenzione della ferrovia; Elettrotreno/automotrice; Carrozza passeggeri; Tender; Set treno; Tram/Tramvia; Altro
zh-TW: 鐵道車輛類型: 守車; 貨車; 機車頭; 鐵路維護車; 電聯車/柴聯車 (EMU/DMU); 客車; 煤水車; 列車組; 路面電車/輕軌; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de material rulant: Furgon de frânare; Vagon de marfă; Locomotivă; Vehicul pentru întreținerea căii ferate; Unitate multiplă (EMU/DMU); Vagon de călători; Tender; Garnitură de tren; Tramvai; Altele
hu: Vasúti gördülőállomány típusa: Fékezőkocsi; Tehervagon; Mozdony; Pályafenntartó jármű; Motorvonat (EMU/DMU); Személyvagon; Szerkocsi; Vonatszerelvény; Villamos; Egyéb
el: Τύπος σιδηροδρομικού υλικού: Σκευοφόρος/Βαγόνι πέδης; Εμπορικό βαγόνι; Μηχανή τρένου; Όχημα συντήρησης γραμμής; Αυτοκινητάμαξα (EMU/DMU); Επιβατικό βαγόνι; Εφοδιοφόρο όχημα (tender); Σετ τρένου; Τραμ; Άλλο